Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5714HV (2) 91 ss/ko H.F. 2545 Section 1. Section 148.3, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 An applicant for a license to practice medicine and surgery 3 or osteopathic medicine and surgery , or the applicantâs 4 designee, shall present to the board all of the following: 5 Sec. 2. Section 148.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsections: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to 8 chapter 17A to set the term of a license to practice medicine 9 and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, but shall not 10 require a license to be renewed more often than once every 11 three years. A license to practice medicine and surgery or 12 osteopathic medicine and surgery shall expire on the licenseeâs 13 birthday. 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. The board shall not require a licensee 15 to complete more than fifteen hours of continuing education 16 credits per calendar year to maintain a license to practice 17 medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. The board shall issue a final decision 19 of an application for a license to practice medicine and 20 surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery within forty-five 21 calendar days of receipt of the application, unless the board 22 notifies the applicant or the applicantâs designee, and, if 23 applicable, the applicantâs employer, of specific concerns 24 that are delaying the final review of the application. In no 25 event shall the board fail to issue a final decision on an 26 application within seventy-five calendar days of receipt of all 27 necessary documentation from the applicant or the applicantâs 28 designee. 29 Sec. 3. Section 148.11A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 30 to read as follows: 31 2. a. An application for an administrative medicine license 32 shall be made to the board. An applicant for an administrative 33 medicine license shall meet all of the requirements established 34 in section 148.3 and any additional requirements established by 35 -1- LSB 5714HV (2) 91 ss/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 2545 the board by rule. The board shall also adopt rules governing 1 the initial issuance and renewal of administrative medicine 2 licenses and establishing fees therefor. All license and 3 renewal fees shall be paid to the board. 4 b. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 5 to set the term of an administrative medicine license, but 6 shall not require an administrative license to be renewed more 7 often than once every three years. An administrative medicine 8 license shall expire on the licenseeâs birthday. 9 c. The board shall not require a licensee to complete more 10 than fifteen hours of continuing education credits per calendar 11 year to maintain an administrative medicine license. 12 d. The board shall issue a final decision on an application 13 for an administrative medicine license within forty-five 14 calendar days of receipt of the application, unless the board 15 notifies the applicant or the applicantâs designee and, if 16 applicable, the applicantâs employer, of specific concerns 17 that are delaying the final review of the application. In no 18 event shall the board fail to issue a final decision on an 19 application within seventy-five calendar days of receipt of all 20 necessary documentation from the applicant or the applicantâs 21 designee. 22